Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB255.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 327 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The practice of physical therapy should be regulated and controlled by this
chapter and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder in order to
protect and safeguard the health and safety of the citizens of the Commonwealth
of Kentucky; and
(2) Each individual licensed or privileged under this chapter shall be responsible and
accountable for making decisions that are based upon the individual's
educational preparation and experience in physical therapy and shall practice
physical therapy with reasonable skill and safety.
SECTION 2. KRS 327.010 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Active patient" means a person who is or has been under a physical therapy
plan of care unless care is transferred or terminated in writing;
(2) "Board" means the Board of Physical Therapy established in Section 5 of this
Act;
(3) "Physical therapist" means a professional person who has met the educational
requirements of this chapter and is licensed to practice physical therapy pursuant
to this chapter;
(4) "Physical therapist assistant" means a person who is licensed pursuant to this
chapter and provides physical therapy services under the direction and
supervision of a licensed physical therapist;
(5) (a) "Physical therapy" means the use of selected knowledge and skills in
Page 1 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
planning, organizing, and directing programs for the care of individuals
whose ability to function is impaired or threatened by disease or injury,
which encompasses preventive measures, screening, tests in aid of diagnosis
and evaluation, and invasive or noninvasive procedures with emphasis on
the skeletal system, integumentary system, neuromuscular and
cardiopulmonary function, as it relates to physical therapy.
(b) "Physical therapy" also includes:
1. Screening or evaluations performed to determine the degree of
impairment of relevant aspects such as but not limited to nerve and
muscle function, including subcutaneous bioelectrical potentials,
motor development, functional capacity, and respiratory or circulatory
efficiency; and
2. Physical therapy treatment, which includes but is not limited to:
a. Physical therapy treatment performed upon referral by a
licensed doctor of medicine, osteopathy, dentistry, chiropractic,
or podiatry;
b. Exercises for increasing or restoring strength, endurance,
coordination and range of motion;
c. Stimuli to facilitate motor activity and learning;
d. Instruction in activities of daily living; and
e. The use of assistive devices and the application of physical
agents to relieve pain or alter physiological status.
(c) "Physical therapy" does not include the use of:
1. Roentgen rays and radium for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes; or
2. Electricity for surgical purposes, including cauterization and colonic
irrigations;
which are not authorized as physical therapy in this chapter;
Page 2 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(6) "Provisional license" means a license granted by the board to an applicant who
has not yet successfully completed the board-approved examination; and
(7) "Refer" or "referral" means the procedure by which a licensed health care
provider designates the initiation of physical therapy treatment by a licensed
physical therapist.
Section 3. KRS 327.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person shall not practice, work, or hold himself or herself out as being able
to practice physical therapy or work as a physical therapist assistant unless the
person:
(a) 1. Meets the educational requirements of this chapter;
2. Is licensed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;
3. Is in good standing with the board; and
4. Holds a license that is not suspended or revoked; or
(b) Is eligible to practice or work through a compact privilege granted under KRS
327.300.
(2) [Nothing contained in ]This chapter shall not be construed to:
(a) Prohibit any person licensed in this state under any other law from engaging
in the practice for which that person is duly licensed;[. Nothing contained in
this chapter shall ]
(b) Prohibit routine and restorative services performed by personnel employed by
hospitals, physicians, or licensed health care facilities as relates to physical
therapists;[. This chapter does not ]
(c) Preclude certified occupational therapists, respiratory technicians, or
respiratory therapists from practicing as defined in the United States
Department of Health, Education and Welfare, Public Health Service, Health
Resources Administration, Bureau of Health Manpower, DHEW publication
No. (HRA) 80-28, "A Report On Allied Health Personnel[.]"; or
Page 3 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(d) Affect or prevent:
1. A physical therapist student from engaging in clinical practice under
the supervision of a licensed physical therapist, as part of the student's
educational program;
2. A physical therapist assistant student from engaging in clinical
practice under the supervision of a licensed physical therapist or of a
physical therapist assistant consistent with administrative regulations
promulgated by the board, as part of the student's educational
program;
3. A physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant who is licensed to
practice in another state or country from conducting or participating
in a clinical residency under the supervision of a physical therapist
licensed in Kentucky and for a period of not more than ninety (90)
days;
4. A physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant who is licensed to
practice in another state or country from conducting or participating
in the teaching of physical therapy in connection with an educational
program and for a period of not more than ninety (90) days;
5. A physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant licensed in
another state or country from performing physical therapy on
members of an out-of-state sports or entertainment group they
accompany to Kentucky;
6. The practice of chiropractic as defined in KRS 312.015;
7. The practice of occupational therapy as defined in KRS 319A.010; or
8. a. A physical therapist or a physical therapist assistant who is
practicing in the United States Armed Services, United States
Public Health Service, or United States Department of Veterans
Page 4 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
Affairs pursuant to federal regulations for jurisdictional
licensure of healthcare providers.
b. If a person described in subdivision a. of this subparagraph
engages in the practice of physical therapy outside the course
and scope of his or her federal employment as a physical
therapist or a physical therapist assistant, he or she shall then be
required to obtain a license in accordance with this chapter and
administrative regulations promulgated by the board[ Persons
regularly employed by the United States shall be exempted from
the provisions of this chapter while engaged in this employment].
(3) A licensed physical therapist may hold himself or herself out as a "physical
therapist" or "licensed physical therapist" and may use the abbreviations "P.T." or
"L.P.T." as a part of or immediately following the physical therapist's name, in
connection with the physical therapist's[his or her] profession.
(4) A licensed physical therapist assistant may hold himself or herself out as a
"physical therapist assistant" or "licensed physical therapist assistant" and may
use the abbreviations "P.T.A." or "L.P.T.A." as a part of or immediately
following the physical therapist assistant's name, in connection with the physical
therapist assistant's profession.
(5) It shall be unlawful for any person, or for any business entity, its employees, agents,
or representatives to use in connection with the person's or entity's name or business
activity the words "physical therapy," "physical therapist," "physiotherapy,"
"physiotherapist," "registered physical therapist," the letters "P.T.," "L.P.T.," or any
other words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia indicating or implying directly or
indirectly that physical therapy is provided or supplied or to bill for physical
therapy unless that physical therapy is provided by or under the supervision of a
physical therapist licensed and practicing in accordance with this chapter.
Page 5 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(6)[(5)] The provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (5)[(4)] of this section shall not
apply to volunteer health practitioners providing services under KRS 39A.350 to
39A.366.
Section 4. KRS 327.025 is amended to read as follows:
Any physical therapist, physical therapist[therapist's] assistant, or employer of physical
therapy practitioners having knowledge of facts by actual or direct knowledge shall report
to the board [of physical therapy ]a physical therapist or physical therapist[therapist's]
assistant who:
(1) Has been convicted of any[a] felony, or of a misdemeanor as referenced by
subsection (2)(f) of Section 10 of this Act that involved acts that bear directly on
the qualifications or ability of the applicant or[,] licensee[, or certificate holder] to
practice physical therapy;
(2) Is suspected of fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure a license to
practice physical therapy or of negligently performing actions that justify action
against a physical therapist or physical therapist[therapist's] assistant's license as
identified in KRS 327.070(2);
(3) Has had a license to practice as a physical therapist or a license[certificate] to work
as a physical therapist[therapist's] assistant denied, limited, suspended, probated, or
revoked in another jurisdiction on grounds sufficient to cause a license [or
certificate ]to be denied, limited, suspended, probated, or revoked in this
Commonwealth; or
(4) Is practicing physical therapy without a current active license, compact
privilege[certificate], or valid provisional license[temporary permit] issued by the
board.
Section 5. KRS 327.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is hereby established a Board of Physical Therapy which shall consist of
seven (7) members who shall be appointed by the Governor as follows:[.]
Page 6 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(a)[(1)] One (1) board member shall be a resident of Kentucky who is not
affiliated with or does not have more than five percent (5%) financial interest
in any health care profession or business; and[.]
(b)[(2)] All other board members shall:
1.[(a)] Be residents of Kentucky;
2.[(b)] Have engaged in the practice of physical therapy in Kentucky for
the past five (5) years; and
3.[(c)] Not have been disciplined by the board, or have been under any
disciplinary action, in the past five (5)[two (2)] years.
(2)[(3)] All vacancies shall be filled by the Governor from a list of at least three (3)
persons [per position ]submitted by the American[Kentucky] Physical Therapy
Association Kentucky Chapter or as provided by KRS 12.070.
(3)[(4)] Appointments[For appointments] to the board [after December 31, 2008, the
first two (2) appointments shall be for a term of two (2) years. The third
appointment shall be for a term of three (3) years. All other subsequent
appointments ]shall be for a term of four (4) years. All members shall serve until
their successors are appointed and qualify. No member shall serve for more than
two (2) consecutive terms.
(4)[(5)] The Governor may remove any member of the board for misconduct,
incompetence, or neglect of duty.
(5)[(6)] The board may request the removal of a board member by the Governor.
(6)[(7)] The board shall annually elect a chair and chair-elect.
(7)[(8)] The board shall provide orientation to all new board members regarding the
duties of the board.
(8) The board may employ an executive director and other personnel and may
purchase materials and supplies it deems necessary for the proper discharge of its
duties.
Page 7 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(9) There shall be no liability on the part of, and no action for damages against, any
current or former board member, representative, agent, or employee of the board,
when the person is functioning within the scope of board duties, acting without
malice and with the reasonable belief that the actions taken by him or her are
warranted by law.
(10) The board may purchase professional liability insurance for its members, staff,
investigators, general counsel, consultants, agents, and employees. The purchase
of or failure to purchase insurance shall not be deemed a waiver of any immunity
already conferred on the board, its members, staff, investigators, general counsel,
consultants, agents, and employees.
(11)[(10)] Each board member shall receive, in addition to travel, lodging, and other
actual and necessary expenses, a per diem not to exceed two hundred fifty[one
hundred twenty] dollars ($250)[($120)] for each day the member is actually
engaged in the discharge of official duties approved by the board. The board shall,
by promulgation of administrative regulations, set the amount of the per diem.
(12) The board may utilize the Attorney General's Office pool of hearing officers in
accordance with KRS 13B.030. However, if the Attorney General's office cannot
provide a hearing officer, the board may employ or contract with a hearing
officer of its choice.
(13) With the approval of the board, the executive director may hire additional officers
and other personnel necessary for the proper functioning of the board, fix their
salaries, and prescribe their duties. Any person employed under this section shall
not be subject to the provisions of KRS Chapter 18A.
Section 6. KRS 327.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall:
(a) Administer and enforce this chapter and set and evaluate the qualifications
of applicants for licensure and for provisional licenses; and
Page 8 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(b) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A to:
1. Effectively carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter,
including the regulation of physical therapists, physical therapist
assistants, and the use of supportive personnel; and
2. Establish the fee amounts for all fees required by this chapter and the
fees for services provided by the board, which shall not exceed
amounts necessary to generate sufficient funds to effectively carry out
and enforce the provisions of this chapter, including costs related to
administration, overhead, staffing, information technology,
investigations, inspections, administrative procedures, court costs,
supplies, equipment, travel, educational awards, education and
outreach efforts, and reserve funds for capital, operational, and
programmatic expenses[It shall be the duty of the State Board of
Physical Therapy to receive applications from persons desiring to
become physical therapists and to determine whether said applicants
meet the qualifications and standards required by this chapter of all
physical therapists. The board shall also be charged with enforcement of
the provisions of this chapter].
(2) The board is an agency of state government with the power to institute criminal
proceedings in the name of the Commonwealth against violators of this chapter, and
to institute civil proceedings to enjoin any violation of this chapter. The board shall
investigate every alleged violation of this chapter coming to its notice by the
complaint procedure set forth in administrative regulations promulgated by the
board, and shall take action as it may deem appropriate. It shall be the duty of the
Attorney General, the Commonwealth's attorneys, and the county attorneys to assist
the board in prosecuting all violations of this chapter.
Page 9 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(3) The board shall meet at least once each quarter at such place in this state as may be
selected by the board. Four (4) members of the board shall constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business. All meetings shall be held at the call of the board
chair[chairman] or at a call of a quorum of members upon not less than ten (10)
days' written notice, unless notice shall be waived. The presence of any member at
any meeting of the board shall constitute a waiver of notice thereof by the member.
(4) The board may conduct investigations and schedule and conduct administrative
hearings in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, to enforce the provisions of this
chapter or administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter. The
board may[shall have the authority to] administer oaths, receive evidence, interview
persons, issue subpoenas, and require the production of books, papers, documents,
or other evidence. In case of disobedience to a subpoena, the board may invoke the
aid of the Franklin Circuit Court. Any order or subpoena of the court requiring the
attendance or testimony of witnesses or the production of documentary evidence
may be enforced and shall be valid anywhere in the Commonwealth.
(5) The board shall keep minutes[a minute book] containing a record of all meetings of
the board.
(6) The board shall maintain an electronic record[a register] of all persons licensed [or
certified ]under this chapter. This record[register] shall show the name of every
licensee [or certificate holder ]in this state, the licensee's[his] current business
or[and] residence address and telephone numbers, email address, and the date and
number of the licensee's[his] license[ or certificate]. A licensee [or certificate
holder ]shall notify the board of a change of name, address, email address, or
telephone number, within thirty (30) days of the change.
(7) [The board's records shall be updated annually.]
[(8) ]The board shall [publish annually and ]make available[,] a current directory of all
licensed physical therapists and [certified ]physical therapist[therapists'] assistants.
Page 10 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(8)[(9)] The board shall adopt a seal which shall be affixed to every license [and
certificate ]granted by it.
(9)[(10)] The board may promulgate administrative regulations establishing a measure
of continued competency as a condition of license renewal.[
(11) The board may promulgate and enforce reasonable administrative regulations for
the effectuation of the purposes of this chapter pursuant to the provisions of KRS
Chapter 13A.]
(10)[(12)] The board shall promulgate by administrative regulation a code of ethical
standards and standards of practice.
(11) The board may issue advisory opinions and declaratory rulings related to this
chapter and the administrative regulations promulgated thereunder as
established by administrative regulations.
(12)[(13)] The board may[shall have the right to] regulate physical therapist[therapists']
assistants and may promulgate reasonable administrative regulations regarding
licensure[certification], limitations of activities, supervision, and educational
qualifications for physical therapist[therapists'] assistants. The board may establish
reasonable fees for the licensure[certification], renewal, and endorsement of
physical therapist[therapists'] assistants. The fees shall not exceed corresponding
fees for physical therapists.
(13) (a)[(14)] The board shall promulgate administrative regulations governing the
physical and mental examination of physical therapists, physical
therapist[therapists'] assistants, or applicants, who may be impaired by reason
of a mental, physical, or other condition that impedes their ability to practice
competently.
(b) For purposes of enforcing this subsection and carrying out other duties
prescribed in this chapter[section], the board shall have the power to order an
immediate temporary suspension in accordance with KRS 13B.125 if there is
Page 11 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
a reasonable cause to believe that a physical therapist, physical
therapist[therapist's] assistant, or applicant may be impaired by reason of a
mental, physical, or other condition or presents an immediate danger to the
health, welfare, or safety of the public[ that impedes his or her ability to
practice competently].
(14) The board may convene committees and task forces to review and advise the
board on pertinent issues of public protection of the practice of physical therapy
in the Commonwealth.
Section 7. KRS 327.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall establish an impaired physical therapy practitioners committee to
promote the early identification, intervention, treatment, and rehabilitation of
physical therapists and physical therapist[therapists'] assistants who may be
impaired by reason of illness or of alcohol or drug abuse, or as a result of any
physical or mental condition.
(2) The board may enter into a contractual agreement with a nonprofit corporation,
physical therapy professional organization, or similar organization for the purpose
of creating, supporting, and maintaining an impaired physical therapy practitioners
committee.
(3) The board may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to effectuate and implement a committee formed by the provisions of
this section.
(4) The[Beginning January 1, 2001, the] board shall collect an assessment fee[ not to
exceed twenty dollars ($20)] per licensee[ or certificate holder], payable to the
board, to be added to each licensure [and certification ]renewal application fee.
Proceeds from the assessment shall be expended on the operation of an impaired
physical therapy practitioners committee formed by the provisions of this section.
The fee shall be set by the promulgation of administrative regulations.
Page 12 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(5) Members of an impaired physical therapy practitioners committee, any
administrator, staff member, consultant, agent, volunteer, or employee of the
committee acting within the scope of their duties and without actual malice, and all
other persons who furnish information to the committee in good faith and without
actual malice shall not be liable for any claim or damages as a result of any
statement, decision, opinion, investigation, or action taken by the committee or by
an individual member of the committee.
(6) All information, interviews, reports, statements, memoranda, or other documents
furnished to or produced by the impaired physical therapy practitioners committee,
all communication to or from the committee, and all proceedings, findings, and
conclusions of the committee, including those relating to intervention, treatment, or
rehabilitation, which in any way pertain or refer to a physical therapist or physical
therapist[therapist's] assistant who is or may be impaired, shall be privileged and
confidential.
(7) All records and proceedings of the committee that pertain or refer to a licensee[ or a
certificate holder] who may be, or actually is, impaired shall be privileged and
confidential and shall be used by the committee and its members only in the
exercise of the proper function of the committee and shall not be considered public
records and shall not be subject to court subpoena and subject to discovery or
introduction as evidence in any civil, criminal, or administrative proceedings except
as described in subsection (8) of this section.
(8) The committee may disclose information relative to an impaired physical therapist
or physical therapist[therapist's] assistant only when:
(a) It is essential to disclose the information to persons or organizations needing
the information in order to address the intervention, treatment, or
rehabilitation needs of the impaired practitioner;
(b) Its release is authorized in writing by the impaired physical therapist or
Page 13 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
physical therapist[therapist's] assistant; or
(c) The information is subject to court order or the disclosure is otherwise
authorized by law.
(9) The impaired physical therapy practitioners committee shall make an annual report
to the board.
Section 8. KRS 327.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Before the board may issue a license to a physical therapist applicant or a
physical therapist assistant applicant[applying for licensure by the board as a
physical therapist], the applicant[a person] shall have successfully completed an
accredited program in physical therapy approved by the board. No school shall be
approved by the board unless it has been approved for the educational preparation
of physical therapists or physical therapist assistants by the recognized national
accrediting agency for physical therapy educational programs.
(2) Any person who possesses the qualifications required by this chapter and who
desires to apply for licensure as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant
in Kentucky shall make written application to the board, on forms to be provided by
the board. The application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee
in an amount to be determined by the board[, but not to exceed two hundred fifty
dollars ($250)].
(3) If it appears from the application that the applicant possesses the qualifications
required by this chapter and has not yet successfully completed the board-approved
examination, the applicant shall be allowed to sit for the examination and tested in
the subjects the board may determine to be necessary.
(4) Examinations shall be held within the state at least once a year at the time and place
as the board shall determine.
(5) An applicant who is admitted to the examination or an applicant who has submitted
satisfactory evidence that the applicant[he] has been accepted as a candidate for
Page 14 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
licensure by examination in a state which offers an examination approved by the
board may be granted a provisional license[temporary permit] which shall be valid
until the applicant's[his] examination is graded and the applicant[he] is notified by
the board of the applicant's[his] score. The board may summarily withdraw a
provisional license[temporary permit] upon determination that the person has made
any false statement to the board on the application, or the person fails to pass an
examination approved by the board.
(6) An applicant who receives a passing score as determined by the board and who
meets the other qualifications required by this chapter shall be licensed as a
physical therapist or physical therapist assistant.
(7) An applicant who fails to receive a passing score on the[his] examination shall not
be licensed, but the board may, by administrative regulation, permit applicants to
take the examination more than once.
(8) All licenses[ and certificates] shall be renewed biennially[,] upon payment on or
before March 31 of each odd-numbered[uneven-numbered] year of a renewal fee in
an amount to be promulgated by the board by administrative regulations.
(9) Licenses[ and certificates] which are not renewed by March 31 of each odd-
numbered[uneven-numbered] year shall lapse.[
(10) This chapter shall not be construed to affect or prevent:
(a) A student of physical therapy from engaging in clinical practice under the
supervision of a licensed physical therapist, as part of the student's
educational program;
(b) A physical therapist who is licensed to practice in another state or country
from conducting or participating in a clinical residency under the supervision
of a physical therapist licensed in Kentucky and for a period of not more than
ninety (90) days;
(c) A physical therapist who is licensed to practice in another state or country
Page 15 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
from conducting or participating in the teaching of physical therapy in
connection with an educational program and for a period of not more than
ninety (90) days;
(d) A physical therapist licensed in another state or country from performing
therapy on members of the out-of-state sports or entertainment group they
accompany to Kentucky; or
(e) The practice of chiropractic as defined in KRS 312.015(3).]
Section 9. KRS 327.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall issue a license to:
(a) An individual who holds a valid license from another state, who meets
requirements specified in KRS 327.050 and who has no imposed or pending
disciplinary actions.
(b) An individual who has been educated as a physical therapist or physical
therapist assistant outside the United States and who has:
1. Completed the application process;
2. Provided satisfactory evidence to the board that his or her education is
substantially equivalent to the requirements for physical therapists or
physical therapist assistants educated in United States accredited
educational programs;
3. Provided written proof that the school of physical therapy education
outside the United States is recognized by its own ministry of education;
4. Successfully completed the examinations provided for in KRS 327.050;
5. Passed the board-approved English language proficiency examinations
if English is not the applicant's[his or her] native language;
6. Successfully completed, prior to licensure, a board-approved, supervised
practice period of not less than three (3) months nor more than six (6)
months, under the direct supervision of a physical therapist who holds
Page 16 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
an unrestricted[ Kentucky] license. This requirement may be satisfied by
at least three (3) months of supervised practice as a physical therapist in
a state with license requirements comparable to or more stringent than
those of Kentucky;
7. Provided proof of legal authorization to reside and seek employment in
the United States or its territories;
8. Provided proof of authorization to practice as a physical therapist or
physical therapist assistant without limitations in the country where the
professional education occurred;
9. Submitted to a prescreening process by an agency approved by the
board; and
10. Submitted educational credentials to the board for evaluation by an
agency approved by the board.
(2) The board may approve an agency to prescreen applicants for initial licensure under
this section.
(3) The board may approve one (1) or more services to provide an evaluation of the
applicant's educational credentials for board approval for licensing under this
section.
(4) The board may waive the requirements of subsection (1)(b) 3., 9., and 10. of this
section if the applicant is a graduate of a professional physical therapy education
program preapproved by the board.
(5) The board may waive the requirements of subsection (1)(b)6. of this section for
an applicant for credentialing by endorsement pursuant to administrative
regulations of the board.
Section 10. KRS 327.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board, after due notice and an opportunity for an administrative hearing
conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B may take any one (1) or a
Page 17 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
combination of the following actions against any licensee, licensee of another
member state as defined in KRS 327.300[certificate holder], or applicant:
(a) Refuse to license[ or certify] any applicant;
(b) Refuse to renew the license[ or certificate] of any person;
(c) Permanently revoke, suspend,[Suspend or revoke] or place on probation the
license[ or certificate] of any person;
(d) Impose restrictions on the scope of practice of any person;
(e) Issue an administrative reprimand to any person; and
(f) Issue a private admonishment to any person[; and
(g) Impose fines for violations of this chapter not to exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500)].
(2) The following acts by a licensee, licensee of another member state as defined in
KRS 327.300[certificate holder], or applicant may be considered cause for
disciplinary action:
(a) Indulgence in excessive use of alcoholic beverages or abusive use of
controlled substances;
(b) Engaging in, permitting, or attempting to engage in or permit the performance
of substandard patient care by himself or by persons working under his
supervision due to a deliberate or negligent act or failure to act, regardless of
whether actual injury to the patient is established;
(c) 1. Having engaged in or attempted to engage in sexual contact as defined
in KRS 510.010, whether consensual or nonconsensual, with any
active patient of record, or with the parent or legal guardian of the
active patient of record, unless a consensual sexual relationship exists
between, and predated, the patient and therapist relationship; or
2. Requesting sexual favors or physical contact of a sexual nature unless
a prior consensual sexual relationship exists with any active patient of
Page 18 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
record of the physical therapist or physical therapist assistant[Having
engaged in or attempted to engage in a course of lewd or immoral
conduct with any person:
1. While that person is a patient of a health care facility defined by KRS
216B.015 where the physical therapist or physical therapist's assistant
provides physical therapy services; or
2. While that person is a patient or client of the physical therapist or
physical therapist's assistant];
(d) Having sexual contact, as defined by KRS 510.010(7), without the consent of
both parties, with any individual[an employee or coworker of the licensee or
certificate holder];
(e) Sexually harassing any individual[an employee or coworker of the licensee or
certificate holder];
(f) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor in the courts of this state or any other
state, territory, or country which impedes a person's[affects his] ability[ to
continue] to practice competently and safely on the public, if in accordance
with KRS Chapter 335B. "Conviction," as used in this paragraph, shall
include a deferred conviction, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence,
finding or verdict of guilt, an Alford plea, an admission of guilt, or a plea of
nolo contendere;
(g) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license [or certificate ]by fraud or material
misrepresentation or making any other false statement to the board;
(h) Engaging in fraud or material deception in the delivery of professional
services, including reimbursement, or advertising services in a false or
misleading manner;
(i) Evidence of gross negligence or gross incompetence in his practice of
physical therapy;
Page 19 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(j) Documentation of being declared mentally disabled by a court of competent
jurisdiction and not thereafter having had his rights restored;
(k) Failing or refusing to obey any lawful order or administrative regulation of the
board;
(l) Promoting for personal gain an unnecessary device, treatment, procedure, or
service, or directing or requiring a patient to purchase a device, treatment,
procedure, or service from a facility or business in which he has a financial
interest;
(m) Being impaired by reason of a mental, physical, or other condition that
impedes his or her ability to practice competently;
(n) Having had a license revoked or suspended, other disciplinary action taken,
or an application for licensure refused, revoked, or suspended by the proper
authorities of another state, territory, or country;
(o) Interfering with an investigation or disciplinary proceeding by failure to
cooperate, by willful misrepresentation of facts, or by the use of threats or
harassment against any patient or witness to prevent that patient or witness
from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any legal action;
(p) Failing to maintain patient confidentiality without documented
authorization of the patient or authorized decision maker, or unless
otherwise required by law;
(q) Engaging, or attempting to engage, in conduct that subverts or undermines
the integrity of the licensure examination process;
(r)[(n)] Violation of KRS 304.39-215; and
(s)[(o)] Conduct that is subject to the penalties under KRS 304.99-060(4) or (5).
(3) A private admonishment shall not:
(a) Be subject to disclosure to the public under KRS 61.878(1)(l);[. A private
admonishment shall not ]
Page 20 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(b) Constitute disciplinary action, but may be used by the board for statistical
purposes or in subsequent disciplinary action against the same licensee[,
certificate holder,] or applicant; or
(c) Be admissible in any proceeding under KRS Chapter 13B, except as
provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(4) (a) The board shall develop specific guidelines through the promulgation of
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to follow
upon receipt of an allegation of sexual misconduct by a physical therapist
or physical therapist assistant licensed by the board or granted a compact
privilege under KRS 327.300.
(b) The guidelines shall include investigation, inquiry, and hearing procedures
which ensure that the process does not revictimize the alleged victim or
cause harm if a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant is falsely
accused.
(5) The board, staff, and investigators may receive periodic education on pertinent
issues, including but not limited to topics affecting the practice of physical
therapy and public protection.
(6) (a) The board may, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A, establish which disciplinary action records may be
expunged.
(b) Any records that are expunged shall be exempt from disclosure under the
Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(c) The board shall not report expunged disciplinary actions for any purpose
other than statistical.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 327 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall establish the amounts, limits, or ranges for any fines imposed
Page 21 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
under this chapter through the promulgation of administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A and shall fine any person who:
(a) Violates or aids in the violation of Section 3, 4, 8, or 9 of this Act for
practicing or for performing services without a license required by the
board;
(b) Is issued a notice of violation by the board for failure to comply with this
chapter or administrative regulations promulgated under this chapter;
(c) Exercises or attempts to exercise control over, interferes with, or attempts to
influence the professional judgment of a licensee in any manner, including
through coercion, collusion, extortion, inducement, or intimidation;
(d) 1. Violates any ruling of the board or hinders any agent of the board in
carrying out the duties assigned to the agent;
2. Is an officer who refuses to enforce the provisions of this chapter
when called upon by the board to do so; or
3. Attempts in any way to hinder or obstruct the board in carrying out the
provisions of this chapter; or
(e) Willfully refuses to obey its lawful orders and resists, obstructs, interferes
with, threatens, attempts to intimidate, or in any other manner interferes
with an agent of the board.
(2) Each day or part of a day that a violation continues is a separate violation and
subject to daily penalties.
(3) For any violation of this chapter, in addition to any other fines designated in this
section, the board may impose on any person fines in an amount equal to the cost
of investigative and legal fees incurred by the board in processing the case.
(4) The board may seek an injunction in the Circuit Court of the county in which the
alleged violation occurred against any individual who practices physical therapy
without a license issued by the board under this chapter or a compact privilege
Page 22 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
granted under KRS 327.300.
Section 12. KRS 327.075 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may reinstate within three (3) years a license[ or certificate] which has
lapsed[,] upon payment of the prescribed renewal fee and, in addition, the payment
of a reinstatement fee to be promulgated by the board by administrative regulations.
(2) The board may reinstate a license[ or certificate] which has been lapsed for more
than three (3) years[,] upon a showing that the applicant is able to practice with
reasonable competency. In determining competency, the board may require the
applicant to successfully complete additional requirements established by the
board by promulgation of an administrative regulation in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A[all or any part of the required examination].
(3) The board may reinstate a license which has been suspended or revoked under
provisions of this chapter if, after a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B, the board determines the applicant is able to practice the profession
with reasonable competency and is able to maintain the ethical code and standards
of practice promulgated by administrative regulation. As a condition of
reinstatement, the board may impose reasonable restrictions under which the
licensee[ or certificate holder] shall practice.
(4) Any person aggrieved by a final order of the board denying, suspending, or
revoking that person's[his] license[ or certificate] may appeal to the Franklin
Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
SECTION 13. KRS 327.080 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ
AS FOLLOWS:
(1) All fees and other moneys received by the board pursuant to this chapter shall be
deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of a revolving fund for the use of the
board.
(2) (a) No part of this revolving fund shall revert to the general fund of this
Page 23 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
Commonwealth.
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, fund amounts not expended at the close of a
fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward into the next fiscal
year.
(3) All expenses incurred by the board shall be paid from this revolving fund,
including:
(a) The compensation of members of the board;
(b) Salaries, wages, and benefits of the employees of the board;
(c) Payment of contractors hired by the board;
(d) Administrative services provided to the board;
(e) Investigative and legal services;
(f) Court costs;
(g) Technology expenses related to administration of this chapter; and
(h) All other expenses incurred by board.
Section 14. KRS 327.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A treating physical therapist or physical therapist assistant who provides or
facilitates the use of telehealth shall ensure:
(a) That the informed consent of the patient, or another appropriate person with
authority to make the health care treatment decision for the patient, is
obtained before services are provided through telehealth; and
(b) That the confidentiality of the patient's medical information is maintained as
required by this chapter and other applicable law. At a minimum,
confidentiality shall be maintained through appropriate processes, practices,
and technology as designated by the board and that conform to applicable
federal law.
(2) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to implement this section and as necessary to:
Page 24 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 255/GA
(a) Prevent abuse and fraud through the use of telehealth services;
(b) Prevent fee-splitting through the use of telehealth services; and
(c) Utilize telehealth in the provision of physical therapy and in the provision of
continuing education.
(3) For purposes of this section, "telehealth" means the use of interactive audio, video,
or other electronic media to deliver health care. It includes the use of electronic
media for physical therapy diagnosis, consultation, treatment, transfer of health or
medical data, and continuing education.
Section 15. KRS 327.310 is amended to read as follows:
The Board of Physical Therapy established in KRS 327.030 shall require a national and
state criminal background investigation for every applicant seeking a license[,
certificate,] or provisional license[temporary permit] issued by the board permitting the
applicant to engage in a profession authorized by the board. The criminal background
investigation shall be by means of a fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky
State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation, pursuant to the following requirements:
(1) The applicant shall provide the applicant's[his or her] fingerprints to the
Department of Kentucky State Police for submission to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation after a state criminal background check is conducted;
(2) The results of the national and state criminal background check shall be sent to the
board for the screening of applicants;
(3) The board shall be prohibited from releasing any criminal history record
information to any private entity or other licensing board, or authorizing receipt by
such entity or board; and
(4) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police or the Federal Bureau
of Investigation shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the
request and conducting the background check. The board may charge this fee to the
applicant for licensure[ or certification].
Page 25 of 25
HB025510.100 - 1376 - XXXX 2/28/2025 9:38 AM GA